test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sukaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sukā: # Noun 28 'eng /est sukk/fin' - full paradigm
     sukā+N+Sg+Nom: sukā
     sukā+N+Sg+Gen: sukā
     sukā+N+Sg+Par: sukkõ
     sukā+N+Sg+Dat: sukān
     sukā+N+Sg+Ins: sukāks
     sukā+N+Sg+Ill: sukkõ
     sukā+N+Sg+Ela: sukāst
     sukā+N+Pl+Nom: sukād
     sukā+N+Pl+Gen: sukād
     sukā+N+Pl+Par: sukţi
     sukā+N+Pl+Dat: sukādõn
     sukā+N+Pl+Ins: sukādõks
     sukā+N+Pl+Ill: sukīž
     sukā+N+Pl+Ela: sukīst
